Nevada, session 83, SB16.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 624 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
If a person who is not a licensee submits a bid on a job situated
within this State, in violation of the provisions of this chapter, and
the value of the work to be performed is $1,000 or more, including
labor and materials, the Board may, for a period of not more than
1 year after the date on which the person submitted the bid, refuse
to issue the person a license.
Sec. 2. NRS 624.3016 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.3016 The following acts or omissions, among others,
constitute cause for disciplinary action under NRS 624.300:
1. Any fraudulent or deceitful act committed in the capacity of
a contractor, including, without limitation, misrepresentation or the
omission of a material fact.
2. A conviction of a violation of NRS 624.730, or a conviction
in this State or any other jurisdiction of a felony relating to the
practice of a contractor or a crime involving moral turpitude.
3. Knowingly making a false statement in or relating to the
recording of a notice of lien pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 108.226.
4. Failure to give a notice required by NRS 108.227, 108.245,
108.246 or 624.520.
5. Failure to comply with:
(a) NRS 624.920, 624.930, 624.935 or 624.940 or any
regulations of the Board governing contracts for work concerning
residential pools and spas.
(b) NRS 624.860 to 624.875, inclusive, or any regulations of the
Board governing contracts for work concerning residential
photovoltaic systems used to produce electricity.
(c) NRS 624.970 or any regulations of the Board governing
contracts for work concerning a residential improvement.
6. Failure to comply with NRS 624.600.
7. Misrepresentation or the omission of a material fact, or the
commission of any other fraudulent or deceitful act, to obtain a
license.
8. Failure to pay an assessment required pursuant to
NRS 624.470.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
9. Failure to file a certified payroll report that is required for a
contract for a public work.
10. Knowingly submitting false information in an application
for qualification or a certified payroll report that is required for a
contract for a public work.
11. Failure to notify the Board of a conviction or entry of a
plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere pursuant to
NRS 624.266.
12. Failure to provide a builder’s warranty as required by NRS
624.602 or to respond reasonably to a claim made under a builder’s
warranty.
13. The making, or the causing to be made, of a false or
misleading statement or representation, or the omission of a material
fact, by a licensee who is a natural person, an owner of a licensee, a
managing officer of a licensee or any person who qualifies on behalf
of a licensee pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 624.260 in connection
with the application of another person for a contractor’s license for
the purpose of assisting the applicant to obtain the license.
14. Interfering or attempting to interfere with an
investigation or disciplinary proceeding of the Board or any other
legal action to which the Board is a party, including, without
limitation, by threatening, harassing or otherwise influencing a
person because the person has provided or may provide evidence
in the investigation, disciplinary proceeding or legal action.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting a
person or a representative of the person from engaging in any
lawful action:
(a) In the course of preparing or presenting a position,
argument or defense in the investigation, disciplinary proceeding
or other legal action described in this subsection.
(b) In accordance with the provisions of NRS 108.221 to
108.246, inclusive, or NRS 624.606 to 624.630, inclusive.
Sec. 3. NRS 624.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.750 1. It is unlawful for a person to commit any act or
omission described in subsection 1 of NRS 624.3012, subsection 2
of NRS 624.3013, NRS 624.3014 or subsection 1, 3 , [or] 7 or 14 of
NRS 624.3016.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and unless a
greater penalty is otherwise provided by a specific statute, any
person who violates subsection 1, NRS 624.305, subsection 1 of
NRS 624.700 or NRS 624.720 or 624.740:
(a) For a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $4,000, and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
may be further punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
(b) For the second offense, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and
shall be punished by a fine of not less than $4,000 nor more than
$10,000, and may be further punished by imprisonment in the
county jail for not more than 364 days.
(c) For the third or subsequent offense, is guilty of a category E
felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $10,000 nor
more than $20,000, and may be further punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for not less than 1 year and not more than 4 years.
3. If a person is guilty of a violation of subsection 1 of NRS
624.700, the maximum fines set forth in subsection 2 may be
exceeded by adding thereto a fine enhancement of not more than 10
percent of the value of any contract that the person entered into in
violation of subsection 1 of NRS 624.700, if that person commenced
any work or received any money relating to the contract.
4. It is unlawful for a person to receive money for the purpose
of obtaining or paying for services, labor, materials or equipment if
the person:
(a) Willfully fails to use that money for that purpose by failing
to complete the improvements for which the person received the
money or by failing to pay for any services, labor, materials or
equipment provided for that construction; and
(b) Wrongfully diverts that money to a use other than that for
which it was received.
5. Unless a greater penalty is otherwise provided by a specific
statute, any person who violates subsection 4:
(a) If the amount of money wrongfully diverted is $1,000 or
less, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be punished by a
fine of not less than $2,000 nor more than $4,000, and may be
further punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more
than 364 days.
(b) If the amount of money wrongfully diverted is more than
$1,000, is guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished by a
fine of not less than $5,000 nor more than $10,000, and may be
further punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less
than 1 year and not more than 4 years.
6. Imposition of a penalty provided for in this section is not
precluded by any disciplinary action taken by the Board against a
contractor pursuant to the provisions of NRS 624.300 to 624.305,
inclusive.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)